Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Article 2. Certified Seed Board.

§ 3.2-4021.
Certified Seed Board; purpose.

The Certified Seed Board is hereby established as a policy board that is a unit of and is within the Cooperative Extension of the Virginia Polytechnic Institute and State University. The purpose of the Certified Seed Board is to establish certification standards for agricultural and vegetable seed.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-220; 1958, c. 30; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-276; 1980, c. 413; 1985, c. 448; 1992, c. 121; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-4022.
Membership; terms; quorum; meetings.

The Certified Seed Board shall have a total membership of seven consisting of two nonlegislative citizen members and five ex officio members. Nonlegislative citizen members shall be appointed as follows: one member of the Virginia Seedsmen’s Association and one member of the Virginia Crop Improvement Association shall be appointed by the Governor subject to confirmation by the General Assembly. Such appointments may be made from lists of three names nominated by each such Association and submitted at least 90 days before the expiration of the member’s term for which the nominations are being provided. If said organizations fail to provide the nominations at least 90 days before the expiration date pursuant to this section, the Governor may appoint other nominees that meet the criteria provided by this section. The Commissioner, the Director of the Agricultural Experiment Station at Blacksburg, the Director of the Virginia Cooperative Extension, the Head of the Crop and Soil Environmental Sciences Department of the Virginia Polytechnic Institute and State University, and the Dean for the School of Agriculture at Virginia State University or their designees shall serve ex officio with voting privileges. Nonlegislative citizen members of the Certified Seed Board shall be citizens of the Commonwealth.

Nonlegislative citizen members of the Certified Seed Board shall serve for terms of three years. Ex officio members of the Certified Seed Board shall serve terms coincident with their terms of office. Appointments to fill vacancies, other than by expiration of a term, shall be for the unexpired terms. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments. All members may be reappointed.

The Certified Seed Board shall elect a chairman and vice-chairman from among its membership. A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum. The meetings of the Certified Seed Board shall be held at the call of the chairman or whenever the majority of the members so request.

The Board shall maintain an office in Blacksburg from which place its duties shall be performed.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-220, 3-223; 1958, c. 30; 1966, c. 702, §§ 3.1-276, 3.1-279; 1980, c. 413; 1985, c. 448; 1992, c. 121; 2008, c. 860; 2011, cc. 691, 714.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2011, cc. 691 and 714, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act providing for (i) staggered terms for board, council, or commission members and (ii) two-year terms for chairmen appointed by the Governor shall not affect current members or chairmen whose terms have not expired as of July 1, 2011.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 691 and 714 are identical, and in the first paragraph, added “and submitted at least 90 days before the expiration of the member’s term for which the nominations are being provided” to the end of the third sentence, and added the fourth sentence.

§ 3.2-4023.
Compensation and expenses.

The members of the Board shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in §

2.2-2825

. Funding for the costs of expenses of the members shall be provided by the Certified Seed Board. Expenses shall be paid by the Treasurer, on warrants of the Comptroller, and issued on vouchers signed by the chairman of the Certified Seed Board or his designee.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-222; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-278; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-4024.
Powers and duties of the Certified Seed Board.

The Certified Seed Board shall have the following powers and duties:

To encourage the production and use of certified seed as an economic measure when consistent with a fair profit for the certified seed producer; to advise cooperation of marketing systems for certified seed producers through seed dealers or cooperative warehouses; to control standards and grades and distribution of certified seed stocks other than through private sales by producers; to make all certified seed stocks available for market demands through pooling or other means; to insure to producers uniform percentage sales; and to distribute among producers on a fair basis the carry-over of unsold certified seed stocks for sale and distribution commercially;

Adopt regulations that establish standards of health, vigor, purity, and type for the certification of agricultural seed, vegetable seed and of tubers used for planting purposes;

Provide for the certification and procurement of agricultural and vegetable seed, and of tubers used for planting purposes;

Adopt brands;

Select producers of certified seed by general regulation and systematic examination; and

Under the supervision of the Director of the Cooperative Extension Service of the Virginia Polytechnic Institute and State University and at the discretion of the Certified Seed Board, appoint a chief of field forces; additional field personnel as necessary; and a full-time administrative secretary who shall have charge of all clerical assistants and all records and official files of the Board.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-221, 3-226; 1952, c. 579; 1958, c. 483; 1966, c. 702, §§ 3.1-277, 3.1-282; 1973, c. 401; 1980, c. 413; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-4025.
Regulations.

The Certified Seed Board may adopt regulations after a public hearing and investigation. At least 15 days prior to the public hearing, the Certified Seed Board shall publish a notice of the general object, time, and place in a newspaper of general circulation published in the City of Richmond, together with any other dissemination of notice as is deemed advisable.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-224; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-280; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-4026.
Illegal use of word “certified”; who may make certification; standards; penalty.

It is unlawful for any person to use the term “certified” or imply certification relative to any agricultural seeds, vegetable seeds, tubers for planting purposes, or plants offered for sale unless such seeds, tubers, or plants have been certified as follows:

If the seeds, tubers, or plants were produced in another state or in a foreign country, certification by authorized inspection officials of the place of origin shall be sufficient if accepted by the Board.

If the seeds, tubers, or plants were produced in Virginia, certification shall be by the producers under authorization of the Board, its agents, or the Department.

Any person who violates this section is guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor. Each violation shall be a separate offense.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-227; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-283; 1980, c. 413; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 3.2-4027.
Certification by Department, Commissioner, or Board not affected.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to regulate, restrict, or affect the certification of seeds, plants, or other materials by the Department, the Commissioner, or the Board.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-228; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-284; 2008, c. 860.